Hawaii statutes.
§29-13 Governor may accept federal acts.
The governor may accept, on behalf of the State, the provisions of any act of
Congress making grants or allotments of federal-aid moneys available for
expenditure in the State. [L 1939, c 196, §1; RL 1945, §401; RL 1955, §12-3;
HRS §29-13]

Case Notes

Cited: 38 H. 310, 318.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next